Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.490

Interest bearing warrants.

A metropolitan council shall have the power to authorize the issuance of interest bearing warrants on such terms and conditions as the metropolitan council shall provide and to repay the interest bearing warrants with any moneys legally authorized for such purposes, including tax receipts where appropriate.

[ 1993 c 240 s 15; 1965 c 7 s 35.58.490. Prior: 1957 c 213 s 49.]